Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 1

General Provisions

42-2-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Aeronautics” means:

The science and art of flight, including, but not limited to, transportation by aircraft;

The operation, construction, repair, or maintenance of aircraft, aircraft power plants and accessories, including the use, repair, packing, and maintenance of parachutes;

The design, establishment, construction, extension, operation, improvement, repair, or maintenance of airports or other air navigation facilities; and

Instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining thereto;

“Aeronautics instructor” means any individual who for hire or reward engages in giving instruction or offering to give instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics. “Aeronautics instructor” excludes any instructor in a public school, university, or institution of higher learning duly accredited and approved for carrying on collegiate work, who instructs in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, only in the performance of that person's duties at the school, university or institution;

“Air navigation facility” means any facility, other than one owned or operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of these facilities;

“Air school” means:

Any aeronautics instructor who advertises, represents or holds out as giving or offering to give instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics; and

Any person who advertises, represents or holds out as giving or offering to give instruction in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics whether for or without hire or reward. “Air school” excludes any public school or university, or institution of higher learning duly accredited and approved for carrying on collegiate work;

“Aircraft” means any contrivance now known, or hereafter invented, used or designed for navigation of or flight in the air;

“Airman” means:

Any individual who engages, as the person in command, or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, in the navigation of aircraft while under way;

Any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances; and

Any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher, or air-traffic control-tower operator;

but does not include any individual employed outside the United States, or any individual employed by a manufacturer of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances to perform duties as inspector or mechanic in connection therewith, or any individual performing inspection or mechanical duties in connection with aircraft owned or operated by that individual;

“Airport” means any area of land or water that is used, or intended for use, for the landing and taking off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or avigation easements or rights-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located on such areas, easements or rights-of-way;

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or that is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off;

“Approach surface” means the imaginary sloping plane beginning at the end of a runway or landing strip and rising uniformly over the approach area at the required slope;

“Avigation easement” means any easement that includes all or any part of the following:

The right to unobstructed and unrestricted flight of aircraft, in, through and across the airspace over and above certain described land, at the altitude or height above the surface of the land as determined by the department of transportation;

The right to enter upon certain described land for the purpose of removing and preventing any use of the land or the construction or erection of any buildings, structures or facilities and the growth of any trees or objects upon the real estate, over, above and across certain described land, other than those uses, buildings, structures, facilities, growths of trees or objects expressly excepted; and

The right to prevent the use of the land by any assembly of persons or the use of the land in such a manner as might attract or bring together an assembly of persons on the land;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Disburse” or “expend” means disburse or expend through the state treasurer in the manner required by law for the disbursement and expending of public moneys, except that no special legislative appropriation shall be required;

“General aviation industry” means all aviation in this state with the exception of the airlines and the military;

“Landing strip” means that part of the area within an airport boundary that either in its natural state or as a result of construction work is suitable for the landing and take off of aircraft;

“Municipal” means pertaining to a municipality as defined in this section;

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city, incorporated town, authority, district or other political subdivision or public corporation of this state;

“Operation of aircraft” or “operate aircraft” means the use, navigation or piloting of aircraft in the airspace over this state or upon any airport within this state;

“Parachute” includes any device used for the aerial descent of airmen or passengers from aircraft while such aircraft is in flight;

“Parachute jump” means exit from, departure from or bailing out of an aircraft in flight by airmen or passengers;

“Permit” means a permit issued by the department under this chapter;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other similar representative of such a person;

“Public use airport” means any area of land or water, or both, designed and set aside for the taking off and landing of aircraft and utilized or to be utilized in the interest of the public for those purposes;

“Regularly scheduled aeronautics” means those flight activities conducted in accordance with a published schedule such as the “Official Airline Guide,” or those flight activities routinely flown on certain days of the week or month; provided, that any activities flown less than an average of three (3) times per week are excepted from this definition;

“Runway” means the paved, hard surfaced, or stabilized portion of a landing strip;

“State” or “this state” means the state of Tennessee;

“State airway” means a route in the navigable airspace over and above the lands or waters of this state, designated by the department as a route suitable for air navigation;

“Structure” means any object constructed or installed by humans, including, but not limited to, buildings, towers, smokestacks, electronic transmission or receiving towers and antennae, and overhead transmission lines;

“Transitional surface” means an imaginary sloping plane having a profile perpendicular to the extended runway or landing strip longitudinal centerlines, beginning at the outside edge of the approach surface and rising uniformly at the required slope; and

“Urban areas” means the five (5) most populous regions of the state that lie within twenty-five (25) miles of an airport.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 1; 1969, ch. 82, § 1; 1977, ch. 137, § 1; T.C.A., § 42-202; Acts 1980, ch. 631, § 1; 1981, ch. 264, § 17.

Cross-References. Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Airport, annexation-free zone, §6-58-116.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §7-3-313.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §13-20-217.

Annexation of regional airport commission property, §6-51-117.

Government tort liability, title 29, ch. 20.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Municipal powers, title 6, ch. 54.

Tennessee insurance guaranty associations bonds, title 4, ch. 31, part 8.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Administrative Law — 1964 Tennessee Survey (E. Blythe Stason), 18 Vand. L. Rev. 1047.

Comparative Legislation. Aeronautics commission or department:

Ala. Code §23-1-350 et seq.

Ark. Code §23-14-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §6-1-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.024 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-1-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 63-45 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-1.1 et seq.

Collateral References.

Liability of United States for negligence of air traffic controller. 46 A.L.R. Fed. 24.

Aviation
3, 7.

42-2-102. Purpose of chapter.

It is declared that the purpose of this chapter is to further the public interest and aeronautical progress by:

Providing for the protection and promotion of safety in aeronautics;

Cooperating in effecting uniformity of the laws and regulations relating to the development and regulation of aeronautics in the several states consistent with federal aeronautics laws and regulations;

Granting to a state agency such powers and imposing upon it such duties that the state may properly perform its functions relative to aeronautics and effectively exercise its jurisdiction over persons and property within its jurisdiction, assist in the development of a statewide system of airports, cooperate with and assist the municipalities of the state and others engaged in aeronautics, and encourage and develop aeronautics;

Establishing only such regulations as are essential in order that persons engaged in aeronautics of every character may so engage with the least possible restriction, consistent with the safety and the rights of others; and

Providing for cooperation with the federal authorities in the development of a national system of civil aviation and for coordination of the aeronautical activities of those authorities and the authorities of this state.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-203.

42-2-103. Public purpose of activities — Immunity.

The acquisition of any lands or interests in lands pursuant to this chapter, the planning, acquisition, establishment, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, and operation of airports, air navigation facilities, and avigation easements and the acquisition, lighting, marking or eliminating of airport hazards, whether by the state separately or jointly with any municipality or municipalities, or airport authority, and the exercise of any other powers granted in this chapter to the department are declared to be public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity, and no action or suit shall be brought or maintained against the state or any municipality, or airport authority or any officers, agents, servants, or employees of the foregoing, in or about the construction, maintenance, operation, superintendence, or management of any state or municipal airport or airport authority, navigation facility, avigation easement or airport hazard.

All lands and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of the state in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are declared to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 11; 1977, ch. 137, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 42-219, 42-2-118.

42-2-104. Federal airman and aircraft certificates.

Operation Without Certificate, Permit or License Unlawful. It is unlawful for any person to operate or cause or authorize to be operated any civil aircraft within this state, unless that aircraft has an appropriate effective certificate, permit or license issued by the United States, if such certificate, permit or license is required by the United States. It is unlawful for any person to engage in aeronautics as an airman in the state unless that person has an appropriate effective airman certificate, permit, rating or license issued by the United States authorizing that person to engage in the particular class of aeronautics in which such person is engaged, if a certificate, permit, rating or license is required by the United States.

Exhibition of Certificates.

Where a certificate, permit, rating or such person's license is required for an airman by the United States, it shall be kept in the airman's personal possession when the airman is operating within the state and shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of any peace officer, or any other officer of the state or of a municipality or member, official or employee of the department, authorized pursuant to § 42-2-215, to enforce the aeronautics laws, or any official, manager or person in charge of any airport upon which the airman shall land, or upon the reasonable request of any other person.

Where a certificate, permit or license is required by the United States for an aircraft, it shall be carried in the aircraft at all times while the aircraft is operating in this state, shall be conspicuously posted in the aircraft where it may be readily seen by passengers or inspectors, and shall be presented for inspection upon the demand of any peace officer, or any other officer of this state or of a municipality or member, official, or employee of the department authorized pursuant to § 42-2-215 to enforce the aeronautics laws, or any official, manager or person in charge of any airport upon which the aircraft shall land, or upon the reasonable request of any person.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 13; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-221, 42-2-120.

42-2-105. Violation of chapter, regulations or orders — Penalty.

A violation of this chapter, or any of the rules, regulations or orders issued pursuant to this chapter, is a Class E felony.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-229, 42-2-128; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 34.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class E felony, §40-35-111.

Cited: State v. Russell, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 161 (Tenn. Crim. App. Mar. 15, 2012).

Collateral References.

Liability for civilian skydiver's or parachutist's injury or death. 95 A.L.R.3d 1280.

42-2-106. Parachute jumps.

It is unlawful for any airman or passenger to parachute jump from an aircraft that is in flight, except in an emergency declared by the pilot in command of the aircraft, or unless such jump is made in compliance with existing federal regulations as are set forth by the federal aviation administration and with the equipment as prescribed by the existing rules and regulations of the federal aviation administration. Any airman or passenger who parachute jumps from an aircraft shall comply fully with part 105 of the federal air regulations.

All permanent drop zones are to be registered with the department. The registration is to include the drop zone's location, the names of those persons responsible for activities at the drop zone, the name of the organization involved, and the written permission of the property owner or airport manager, if an airport is the drop zone.

No provision in this section shall apply to personnel of the federal or state military forces making military parachute jumps in accordance with military orders or regulations.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 31; 1965, ch. 211, § 1; 1972, ch. 829, § 26; 1974, ch. 695, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 42-237, 42-2-136.

Compiler's Notes. Part 105 of the federal air regulations, referred to in this section, is compiled as 14 CFR § 105.1 et seq.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation of chapter, §42-2-105.

Collateral References.

Liability for civilian skydiver's or parachutist's injury or death. 95 A.L.R.3d 1280.

42-2-107. License, tax or payment for use of publicly owned public use airports by certain aircraft prohibited — Exception — Exemption.

It is unlawful for any municipality to require the payment of any license fee, tax or otherwise charge any sum of money for the use of any publicly owned public use airport for purpose of landing, taking off or any other purpose directly connected with that purpose for aircraft whose gross weight is twelve thousand five hundred pounds (12,500 lbs.) or less, except such planes used by regularly scheduled aeronautics; provided, that this section shall not be construed to make it unlawful to require payment for overnight storage of aircraft or to charge a fee or tax in conjunction with the purchase of aviation fuel; and provided further, that all airports operated by metropolitan airport authorities created pursuant to chapter 4 of this title are exempt from this section and that the department, for good cause shown, may exempt any publicly owned public use airport from all or any portion of this section.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 35; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., § 42-241; Acts 1980, ch. 631, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 17; T.C.A., §42-2-140.